Utah statutes.
53-3-226.   Grounds for confiscation of licenses, plates, and other articles
issued by state.
(1)  The division or a peace officer acting in his official capacity may take
possession of any certificate of title, registration card, decal, permit,
license certificate, permit, registration plate, or any other article issued
by the state:
(a)  that is fictitious or altered;
(b)  that has been unlawfully or erroneously issued;
(c)  that is unlawfully or erroneously displayed; or
(d)  as required under Section 41-6a-520, 53-3-223, 53-3-231, or 53-3-418.
(2)  A receipt shall be issued that describes each confiscated item.
